Idaho, session 2025, S1041.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 42-909, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-909. MANAGER OF DISTRIBUTING LATERAL, DITCH, OR OTHER CONDUIT --
APPOINTMENT BY DISTRICT WATERMASTER -- BY DIRECTORS OF IRRIGATION DISTRICT
CANAL COMPANY, OR OTHER IRRIGATION ENTITY -- PAYMENT OF COMPENSATION. (1)
If two (2) or more parties taking water from any main ditch, canal, other
conduit, or reservoir at the same point to be conveyed to their respec-
tive premises for any distance, through the same distributing lateral,
or distributing ditch, or other conduit do not select a manager for said
distributing lateral, ditch, or other conduit as provided in section 42-907,
Idaho Code, or section 42-908, Idaho Code, the watermaster of the water dis-
trict, shall on the written demand of any one or more of said parties, appoint
a manager for said distributing lateral, ditch, or other conduit who shall
have and exercise all the powers and perform all of the duties of a manager
of the distributing lateral, ditch, or other conduit as provided in section
42-910: provided, that, Idaho Code; provided, however, if an irrigation
district, canal company, or other irrigation entity is the owner of the main
ditch, canal, other conduit, or reservoir, then the board of directors of
such district shall, canal company, or other irrigation entity may, upon
such demand, make such appointment.
(2) The compensation of said manager shall be fixed by said watermas-
ter, and shall be paid in the manner provided by section 42-910, Idaho Code,
for the payment of expenses incurred by him. If not paid, it may be col-
lected, with other damages in the action provided by said section: provided,
that; provided, however, if an irrigation district, canal company, or other
irrigation entity is the owner of the main ditch, canal, other conduit, or
reservoir, the board of directors of such district, canal company, or other
irrigation entity shall fix the compensation of said manager; and at the end
of the irrigation season upon the request of such manager the secretary of
such district, canal company, or other irrigation entity shall prorate the
amount of such compensation among the several parties taking water through
such distributing lateral, or distributing ditch upon ditch, or other con-
duit on the basis of the number of acres irrigated by each, and mail each a
statement of the amount prorated to such party, requesting that remittance
be made to such secretary for and on behalf of such manager. In the event any
such parties or either of them, not, no later than the date when irrigation


district assessments are delinquent, remit to such secretary, he shall, upon
receiving same, and without making any entry in his books of account, deliver
it to such manager. Should any such parties or either of them fail or refuse
at such time to remit to said secretary, then such manager may collect as
hereinbefore provided in this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.